Florida, session 2026, SB1484.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âSubsection (7) of section 186.801, Florida 11 Statutes, as amended by SB ___, 2026 Regular Session, is amended 12 to read: 13 186.801âTen-year site plans.â 14 (7)âIn order to enable it to carry out its duties under 15 this section, the commission may, after a hearing, establish an 16 administrative fee that may not exceed $100,000 $1,000 for each 17 proposed plan studied. 18 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 19 SB ___ or other similar legislation takes effect, if such 20 legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an 21 extension thereof and becomes a law.